Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
CHAPTER 437 Offenses Against Public Peace — Conspiracies

437.010.
Breach of peace, riot, rout, unlawful assembly, affray. [Repealed.]

437.011.
Definitions for KRS 437.011 to 437.018. [Repealed.]

437.012.
“Riot” defined — Penalty. [Repealed.]

437.013.
“Inciting to riot” defined — Penalty. [Repealed.]

437.014.
“Failure to disperse” defined — Penalty. [Repealed.]

437.015.
“Unlawful assembly” defined — Penalty. [Repealed.]

437.016.
“Disorderly conduct” defined — Penalty. [Repealed.]

437.017.
“Loitering” defined — Penalty. [Repealed.]

437.018.
False reporting to law enforcement authorities. [Repealed.]

437.020.
Use of abusive language to provoke assault. [Repealed.]

437.030.
Challenge to duel — Accepting and delivering challenge.

Any person who, in this state, challenges another to fight with any deadly weapon, in or out of this state, and any person who accepts the challenge, shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500) and imprisoned for not less than six (6) nor more than twelve (12) months. Any person who knowingly carries or delivers such a challenge in this state, or consents in this state to be a second to either party shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100) and imprisoned for thirty (30) days.

History.

1269.

437.040.
Disturbing church, school, public assemblage. [Repealed.]

437.050.
Attempting to interrupt or injure public speaker. [Repealed.]

437.060.
Use of reptiles in religious services.

Any person who displays, handles or uses any kind of reptile in connection with any religious service or gathering shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

1267a-1.

437.070.
Arrest of clergyman while performing religious worship. [Repealed.]

437.080.
Maintaining refreshment stand near association, camp or arbor meeting. [Repealed.]

437.090.
Street car passenger causing disturbance, refusing to pay fare. [Repealed.]

437.095.
Shooting fireworks in public places prohibited. [Repealed.]

437.100.
Presentation of play based on master-slave antagonism or exciting race prejudice. [Repealed.]

437.110.
Conspiracy — Banding together for unlawful purpose. [Repealed.]

437.120.
Penalty if injury or death results from conspiracy — Absence of malice no mitigation — Civil liability. [Repealed.]

437.130.
Governor and county judge may offer rewards. [Repealed.]

437.140.
Witness in prosecution of criminal conspirators not to claim exemption.

In any prosecution for criminal conspiracy it shall be no exemption for a witness that his testimony may incriminate himself. No testimony given by the witness shall be used against him in any prosecution except for perjury, and he shall be discharged from all liability for a violation of any criminal conspiracy law necessarily disclosed in his testimony.

History.

1241a-7: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 406, § 319.

437.150.
Conspiracy to carry on false prosecution. [Repealed.]